Louisiana, session 2026, HB1238.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:35(B) and 38(B) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§35. Simple battery
* * *
B.(1) Whoever commits a simple battery shall be fined not more than one
thousand dollars or imprisoned for not more than six months, or both.
(2) Whoever commits a simple battery against an employee of a regulated
establishment shall be fined not more than two thousand dollars or imprisoned, with
or without hard labor, for not more than two years, or both.
* * *
§38. Simple assault
* * *
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1238 ENROLLED
B.(1) Whoever commits a simple assault shall be fined not more than two
hundred dollars, or imprisoned for not more than ninety days, or both.
(2) Whoever commits a simple assault against an employee of a regulated
establishment shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars or imprisoned for
not more than six months, or both.
Section 2. Part III of Chapter 3 of Title 23 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 23:271 through 274, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART III. THE LOUISIANA BEHIND THE COUNTER PROTECTION ACT
§271. Short title
This Part shall be known and may be cited as the "Louisiana Behind the
Counter Protection Act".
§272. Definitions
As used in this Part, the following terms have the meanings ascribed to them:
(1) "Department" means Louisiana Works.
(2) "Employee" means an employee who engages in duties at or behind a
checkout station, service counter, drive-through window, customer service desk, or
similar place or structure utilized as the point of transaction for an employee and a
customer.
(3) "Workplace violence" means any act of violence or credible threat of
violence, including but not limited to assault, battery, robbery, intimidation, verbal
abuse, threats with a weapon, or any conduct that places an employee in reasonable
fear of physical harm or is directed at an employee while he is performing his duties
at a regulated establishment.
§273. Prohibition against workplace violence; penalties
No person shall commit the offense of workplace violence against an
employee of a regulated establishment. Whoever commits the offense of workplace
violence against an employee of a regulated establishment shall be charged with any
of the following crimes as appropriate:
(1) Simple assault as defined in R.S. 14:38(B)(2).
(2) Simple battery as defined in R.S. 14:35(B)(2).
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1238 ENROLLED
§274. Signage
A. A regulated establishment may display at its premises at least one sign
that contains the following statement in forty-eight point boldface font:
"WARNING: Workplace violence against an employee is a crime and will not be
tolerated. Such acts may result in arrest and criminal conviction under Louisiana law."
B. The department shall prescribe and furnish a sign that conforms with the
specifications provided for in Subsection A of this Section. The department shall
make the sign readily accessible for or distribute the sign to a regulated
establishment.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.